Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6423.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER X Sec. 22. As used in this chapter: (a) "Adoptee" means the individual who is to be adopted, regardless of whether the individual is a child or an adult. (b) "Adoption attorney" means an attorney acting as counsel in an adoption proceeding or case. (c) "Adult former sibling" means an individual who is 18 years of age or older and is related to an adult adoptee either biologically or through adoption by at least 1 common parent, regardless of whether the adult former sibling ever lived in the same household as the adult adoptee. (d) "Agency placement" means a placement in which a child placing agency, the department, or a court selects the adoptive parent for the child and transfers physical custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parent. (e) "Applicant" means an individual or individuals who desire to adopt a child and who have submitted an adoption application to a child placing agency. (f) "Attending practitioner" means a licensed physician or a registered professional nurse certified as a nurse midwife by the Michigan board of nursing. (g) "Best interests of the adoptee" or "best interests of the child" means the sum total of the following factors to be considered, evaluated, and determined by the court to be applied to give the adoptee permanence at the earliest possible date: (i) The love, affection, and other emotional ties existing between the adopting individual or individuals and the adoptee or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, the putative father and the adoptee. (ii) The capacity and disposition of the adopting individual or individuals or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, the putative father to give the adoptee love, affection, and guidance, and to educate and create a milieu that fosters the religion, racial identity, and culture of the adoptee. (iii) The capacity and disposition of the adopting individual or individuals or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, the putative father, to provide the adoptee with food, clothing, education, permanence, medical care or other remedial care recognized and permitted under the laws of this state in place of medical care, and other material needs. (iv) The length of time the adoptee has lived in a stable, satisfactory environment, and the desirability of maintaining continuity. (v) The permanence as a family unit of the proposed adoptive home, or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, the home of the putative father. (vi) The moral fitness of the adopting individual or individuals or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, of the putative father. (vii) The mental and physical health of the adopting individual or individuals or, in the case of a hearing under section 39 of this chapter, of the putative father, and of the adoptee. (viii) The home, school, and community record of the adoptee. (ix) The reasonable preference of the adoptee, if the adoptee is 14 years of age or less and if the court considers the adoptee to be of sufficient age to express a preference. (x) The ability and willingness of the adopting individual or individuals to adopt the adoptee's siblings. (xi) Any other factor considered by the court to be relevant to a particular adoption proceeding, or to a putative father's request for child custody. (h) "Born out of wedlock" means a child conceived and born to a woman who was not married from the conception to the date of birth of the child, or a child whom the court has determined to be a child born during a marriage but not the issue of that marriage. (i) "Central adoption registry" means the registry established by the department under section 27b of this chapter to control the release of identifying adoption information. (j) "Child" means an individual who is less than 18 years of age. (k) "Child placing agency" means a private organization licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to place children for adoption. (l) "Consent" means a document in which all parental rights over a specific child are voluntarily relinquished to the court for placement with a specific adoptive parent. (m) "Court" means the family division of circuit court of this state, or if the context requires, the court having jurisdiction over adoption in another state or country. (n) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (o) "Direct placement" means a placement in which a parent or guardian selects an adoptive parent for a child, other than a stepparent or an individual related to the child within the fifth degree by marriage, blood, or adoption, and transfers physical custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parent. (p) "Father" means an individual who, at the time of the filing of an adoption petition, is any of the following: (i) A man married to the mother of the child at any time from the child's conception to the child's birth, unless a court has determined, after notice and a hearing, that the child was conceived or born during the marriage but is not issue of the marriage. (ii) A man who legally adopts the child. (iii) A man who, by order of filiation or by judgment of paternity, has been judicially determined to be the father of the child. (iv) A man who has been judicially determined to have parental rights of the child. (v) A man whose paternity has been established by the completion and filing of an acknowledgment of parentage in accordance with the acknowledgment of parentage act, 1996 PA 305, MCL 722.1001 to 722.1013. (q) (p) "Formal placement" means a placement that is approved by the court under section 51 of this chapter. (r) (q) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (s) (r) "Petitioner", except as used in section 68b of this chapter, means the individual or individuals who file an adoption petition with the court. (t) (s) "Placement" or "to place" means selection of an adoptive parent for a child and transfer of physical custody of the child to a prospective adoptive parent in compliance with this chapter. (u) "Putative father" means an individual who, at the time of the filing of an adoption petition, is any of the following: (i) A man who is alleged to be the biological father of a child who has no father. (ii) A man whose identity is unknown and who is alleged to be the biological father of a child who has no father. (v) (t) "Relative" means that term as defined in section 13a of chapter XIIA. (w) (u) "Release" means a document in which all parental rights over a specific child are voluntarily relinquished to the department or to a child placing agency. (x) (v) "Rescission petition" means a petition filed by an adult adoptee and his or her parent whose rights have been terminated to rescind the adoption in which a stepparent acquired parental rights and to restore parental rights of that parent according to section 66 of this chapter. (y) (w) "Suitable to be a parent of an adoptee" means a conclusion that there is no specific concern with respect to an individual that would suggest that placement of any child, or a particular child, in the home of the individual would pose a risk of harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the child. (z) (x) "Temporary placement" means a placement that occurs before court approval under section 51 of this chapter and that meets the requirements of section 23d of this chapter. (aa) (y) "Within the fifth degree by marriage, blood, or adoption" means any of the following relationships: parent, step-parent, grandparent, step-grandparent, brother, step-brother, sister, step-sister, uncle, step-uncle, aunt, step-aunt, first cousin, step-first cousin, great aunt, step-great aunt, great uncle, step-great uncle, great grandparent, step-great grandparent, first cousin once removed, step-first cousin once removed, great great grandparent, step-great great grandparent, great great uncle, step-great great uncle, great great aunt, step-great great aunt, great great great grandparent, or step-great great great grandparent. Sec. 51. (1) Not later than 14 days after receipt of the report of investigation, except as provided in subsections (2) and (5), the judge shall examine the report and shall enter an order terminating the parental rights of the child's parent or parents, if there was a parental consent, or the rights of any person in loco parentis, if there was a consent by other than parents, and approve placement of the child with the petitioner if the judge is satisfied as to both of the following: (a) The genuineness of consent to the adoption and the legal authority of the person or persons signing the consent. (b) The best interests of the adoptee will be served by the adoption. (2) If it is necessary to hold a hearing before entering an order terminating the parental rights of a parent, parents, or a person in loco parentis, or if other good cause is shown, the time specified in subsection (1) shall must be extended for an additional 14-day period. (3) Upon entry of an order terminating parental rights of parents or persons in loco parentis, a child is a ward of the court and a consent to adoption executed under section 43 of this chapter shall must not be withdrawn after the order is entered. Entry of the order terminates the jurisdiction of the same court or another court over the child in a divorce or separate maintenance action. If the petitioner for adoption is married to the parent having who has legal custody of the child, the child shall not be made a ward of the court after termination of the parental rights of the other parent. (4) Without making the child a ward of the court, the court may approve placement of a child if the child is placed for adoption in this state by a public or licensed private agency of another state or country and if the law of the sending state or country prohibits the giving of consent to adoption at the time of placement. Before placement of the child in that instance, as described under this subsection, the sending agency shall tender evidence as the court requires to demonstrate that the agency possesses the necessary authority to consent to the adoption at the time of entry of the final order of adoption. After the sending agency has given evidence of its ability to consent, the agency shall not do anything to jeopardize its ability to grant the required consent before entry of the final order of adoption. After the sending agency gives its consent for the adoption, that consent shall must not be withdrawn. (5) If a parent having who has legal custody of the child is married to the petitioner for adoption, the judge shall not enter an order terminating the parental rights of that parent. (6) If a parent's spouse petitions to adopt a child of the parent and the child has no father and the rights of the putative father have been addressed as provided in sections 36, 37, and 39(1) of this chapter, the court, on notice and hearing, may terminate the parental rights of the putative father. If the parents of a child are divorced , or if the parents are unmarried but the father has acknowledged paternity, has otherwise been adjudicated to be a father, or is a putative father who meets the conditions in section 39(2) of this chapter, and if a the parent having whose spouse has petitioned for adoption has custody of the child according pursuant to a court order subsequently marries and that parent's spouse petitions to adopt the child, or under section 6 of the acknowledgement of parentage act, 1996 PA 305, MCL 722.1006, the court, upon on notice and hearing, may issue an order terminating the parental rights of the other parent if both of the following occur: (a) The other parent , having the ability to support, or assist in supporting, the child, has failed or neglected to provide regular and substantial support for the child, according to his or her ability to support, or assist in supporting, the child, or if a support order has been entered, has failed to substantially comply with the order, for a period of 2 years or more before the filing of the petition. A child support order stating that support is $0.00 or that support is reserved shall must be treated in the same manner as if no support order has been entered. (b) The other parent , having the ability to visit, contact, or communicate with the child, has regularly and substantially failed or neglected to do so to visit, contact, or communicate with the child, according to his or her ability for a period of 2 years or more before the filing of the petition. (7) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the prospective adoptive parents with whom a child is placed according to a court order approving placement under this section may consent to all medical, surgical, psychological, educational, and related services for the child.